North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 18. Bank Holding Company Act of 1984.

§§ 53-225 through 53-228.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Sessions Laws 2017-165, s. 12, effective July 21, 2017.

History.

G.S. 53-225

; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1113, s. 1; 1985, c. 683, s. 1; repealed by Session Laws 2017-165, s. 12, effective July 21, 2017. G.S. 53-226; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1113, s. 1; repealed by Session Laws 2017-165, s. 12, effective July 21, 2017. G.S. 53-227; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1113, s. 1; 1989, c. 10; repealed by Session Laws 2017-165, s. 12, effective July 21, 2017. G.S. 53-227.1; 1985, c. 683, s. 2; repealed by Session Laws 2017-165, s. 12, effective July 21, 2017. G.S. 53-228; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1113, s. 1; 1998-215, s. 32; repealed by Session Laws 2017-165, s. 12, effective July 21, 2017.

§ 53-229.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 129, s. 3.

§§ 53-230,
53-231.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-165, s. 12, effective July 21, 2017.

History.

G.S. 53-230

; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1113, s. 1; 1995, c. 129, s. 32; repealed by 2017-165, s. 12, effective July 21, 2017. G.S. 53-231; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1113, s. 1; 1995, c. 129, s. 33; 2009-57, s. 6; repealed by 2017-165, s. 12, effective July 21, 2017.

§ 53-232.

Recodified as

G.S. 53C-10-303

by Session Laws 2017-165, s. 11, effective July 21, 2017.